Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 2A Contributions to Candidates for Public Office

21-5-40.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Affiliated committees” means any two or more political committees (including a separate segregated fund) established, financed, maintained, or controlled by the same business entity, labor organization, person, or group of persons, including any parent, subsidiary, branch, division, department, or local unit thereof.

“Affiliated corporation” means with respect to any business entity any other business entity related thereto: as a parent business entity; as a subsidiary business entity; as a sister business entity; by common ownership or control; or by control of one business entity by the other.

“Business entity” shall have the same meaning as provided in Code Section 21-5-3.

Reserved.

“Person” means an individual.

“Political committee” means: (A) any partnership, committee, club, association, organization, party caucus of the House of Representatives or the Senate, or similar entity (other than a business entity) or any other group of persons or entities which makes a contribution; or (B) any separate segregated fund.

(6.1)

“Political party” means any political party as that term is defined in paragraph (25) of Code Section 21-2-2, as amended; provided, however, that for purposes of this article, local, state, and national committees shall be separate political parties.

(6.2)

“Public office” means the office of each elected public officer as specified in paragraph (22) of Code Section 21-5-3.

“Separate segregated fund” means a fund which is established, administered, and used for political purposes by a business entity, labor organization, membership organization, or cooperative and to which the business entity, labor organization, membership organization, or cooperative solicits contributions.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 922, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, § 11; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 4; Ga. L. 2001, p. 20, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 15/HB 48; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 14/SB 17.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that for purposes of issuing rules and regulations, that Act became effective May 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘ Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Law reviews.

For article, “Georgia Campaign Finance and Disclosure Law,” see 27 Ga. St. B. J. 175 (1991).

For note on the 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 247 (1992).

For article on the 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

21-5-41.
Maximum allowable contributions.

No person, corporation, political committee, or political party shall make, and no candidate or campaign committee shall receive from any such entity, contributions to any candidate for state-wide elected office which in the aggregate for an election cycle exceed:

Five thousand dollars for a primary election;

Three thousand dollars for a primary run-off election;

Five thousand dollars for a general election; and

Three thousand dollars for a general election runoff.

No person, corporation, political committee, or political party shall make, and no candidate or campaign committee shall receive from any such entity, contributions to any candidate for the General Assembly or public office other than state-wide elected office which in the aggregate for an election cycle exceed:

Two thousand dollars for a primary election;

One thousand dollars for a primary run-off election;

Two thousand dollars for a general election; and

One thousand dollars for a general election runoff.

No business entity shall make any election contributions to any candidate which when aggregated with contributions to the same candidate for the same election from any affiliated corporations exceed the per election maximum allowable contribution limits for such candidate as specified in subsection (a) of this Code section.

Candidates and campaign committees may separately account for contributions pursuant to Code Section 21-5-43. Candidates and campaign committees not separately accounting for contributions pursuant to such Code section shall not accept contributions for any election in an election cycle prior to the conclusion of the immediately preceding election in such cycle; provided, however, that contributions may be accepted for a primary election at any time in the election cycle prior to and including the date of such primary election. Upon conclusion of each election, contributions remaining unexpended may be expended on succeeding elections in the election cycle, and contributions not exceeding the contribution limits of this Code section may continue to be accepted for repayment of campaign obligations incurred as a candidate in that election except as provided in subsection (h) of this Code section.

Candidates and campaign committees shall designate on their disclosure reports the election for which a contribution has been accepted. Any contribution not so designated shall be presumed to have been accepted for the election on or first following the date of the contribution.

A contribution by a partnership shall be deemed to have been made pro rata by the partners as individuals for purposes of this Code section, as well as by the partnership in toto unless the partnership by proper action under its partnership agreement otherwise directs allocation of the contribution among the partners. At such direction of the partnership, the contribution may be allocated in any proportion among the partners, including to one or some but not all. Such allocation shall be indicated on the face of any instrument constituting the contribution or on an accompanying document referencing such instrument.

The contribution limitations established by this Code section shall not apply to a loan or other contribution made to a campaign committee or candidate by the candidate or a member of the family of the candidate.

Any candidate or campaign committee who incurs loans on or after January 9, 2006, in connection with the candidate’s campaign for election shall not repay, directly or indirectly, such loans from any contributions made to such candidate or any authorized committee of such candidate after the date of the election for which the loan was made to the extent that such loans exceed $250,000.00.

The contribution limits established by this Code section shall not apply to a bona fide loan made to a candidate or campaign committee by a state or federally chartered financial institution or a depository institution whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation if:

Such loan is made in the normal course of business with the expectation on the part of all parties that such loan shall be repaid; and

Such loan is based on the credit worthiness of the candidate and the candidate is personally liable for the repayment of the loan.

The contribution limitations provided for in this Code section shall not include contributions or expenditures made by a political party in support of a party ticket or a group of named candidates.

At the end of each gubernatorial election cycle, the contribution limitations in this Code section shall be raised or lowered in increments of $100.00 by order of the commission pursuant to a consideration by the commission of inflation or deflation during such cycle or four-year period, as determined by the Consumer Price Index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, and such limitations shall apply until next revised by the commission. The commission shall adopt rules and regulations for the implementation of this subsection.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 922, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 8; Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, § 11; Ga. L. 1995, p. 8, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 4; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 16/HB 48; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 15/SB 17; Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 10/SB 120.

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 2, 2022, rewrote the first sentence of subsection (k), which read: “At the end of the election cycle applicable to each public office as to which campaign contributions are limited by this Code section and every four years for all other elections to which this Code section is applicable, the contribution limitations in this Code section shall be raised or lowered in increments of $100.00 by regulation of the commission pursuant to a determination by the commission of inflation or deflation during such cycle or four-year period, as determined by the Consumer Price Index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor, and such limitations shall apply until next revised by the commission.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that for purposes of issuing rules and regulations, that Act became effective May 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 1/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘ Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Act of 2010.’ ”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1173, § 30/SB 17, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment to this Code section applies to all reports filed on and after January 10, 2011.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Adjustment of contribution limits based upon inflation, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Government Transparency and Campaign Finance Commission, Organization, Sec. 189-1-.07.

Disclosure reports, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Ethics Commission, Chapter 189-3.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

For article, “An Intersection of Laws:
Citizens United v. FEC: Rational Coercion:
Citizens United and a Modern Day Prisoner’s Dilemma,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1105 (2011).

For annual survey on administrative law, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2018).

For article, “SB 221: The Creation of Election Leadership Committees,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 155 (2021).

For note on the 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 247 (1992).

For comment, “Awakening a Slumbering Giant: Georgia’s Judicial Selection System After

White

and

Weaver

,” see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 1035 (2005).

21-5-42.
Contribution to campaign committee deemed contribution to candidate; rules for construction.

For purposes of this article, a contribution to a campaign committee of a candidate for any public office shall be deemed to be a contribution to such candidate. If during any calendar year there occur both a special election including a special primary, special primary runoff, and special election runoff as appropriate and a general election for the same public office and if the same person is a candidate for nomination or election at both such special election including a special primary, special primary runoff, and special election runoff as appropriate and such general election, then this Code section shall apply. Where this Code section applies, a person, corporation, political committee, or political party may contribute up to the maximum amount otherwise allowable under this article to such person or such person’s campaign committee for the purpose of influencing such candidate’s nomination or election at the special primary, special primary runoff, special election, or special election runoff; and the same person, corporation, political committee, or political party may contribute up to the maximum amount otherwise allowable under this article for the purpose of influencing such candidate’s election at the general election or general election runoff. This Code section shall be construed according to the following rules:

It is the general intent of this Code section to allow a person who is a candidate for election at both a special election and a general election in the same calendar year to receive up to but no more than twice the amount of contributions which could otherwise be received from any one donor during the year; and

Seeking nomination at a special primary or general primary shall be considered as seeking election at the ensuing special election or general election for the purpose of determining whether a person is a candidate for election at both the special election and the general election and allowing the application of this Code section; but seeking election at only a single primary and its ensuing election shall not bring this Code section into effect.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-44

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 922, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, § 11; Code Section

21-5-42

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 4.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 4, effective January 1, 2001, redesignated the provisions of former Code Section

21-5-44

as this Code section. Former Code Section

21-5-42

, concerning the maximum allowable contribution by corporations, was based on Code 1981, §

21-5-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 922, § 6, Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 9, Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, § 11.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that for purposes of issuing rules and regulations that Act became effective May 1, 2000.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 247 (1992).

21-5-43.
Accounting for and expenditure of campaign contributions.

A candidate or campaign committee may separately account for contributions for each election in an election cycle for which contributions are accepted. If no contributions are accepted for an election, no corresponding accounting shall be required. Subject to the contribution limits of this chapter, contributions so separately accounted for may be accepted at any time in the election cycle. Upon the conclusion of each election, contributions not exceeding such limits may continue to be accepted for repayment of campaign obligations incurred as a candidate in that election.

A candidate who wishes to accept contributions for more than one election at a time shall separately account for such campaign contributions and shall file an “Option to Choose Separate Accounting” form with the commission prior to accepting contributions for any election other than the candidate’s next upcoming election; provided, however, that a candidate shall only be required to file one such form which shall be utilized for all subsequent elections to the same elective office, regardless of whether an election occurs in a new election cycle.

A candidate who accepts contributions for more than one election at a time may allocate contributions received from a single contributor to any election in the election cycle, provided that the contributions shall not violate maximum allowable contribution limits for any election; provided, however, that in order to allocate contributions to a past election, the candidate shall have outstanding campaign debt from the previous election.

Contributions separately accounted for shall not be expended on a prior election except in conformance with this Code section. Contributions separately accounted for in a primary election may be expended at any time during the election cycle prior to and including the date of the primary.

Contributions remaining unexpended after the date of an election in which the candidate does appear on the ballot may be expended for any future election in the same election cycle without regard to the limitations of Code Section 21-5-41. If there are no further elections in the election cycle or if the candidate or the candidate of the campaign committee is not on the ballot of a further election in the election cycle, any remaining contributions may be used only as provided in Code Section 21-5-33.

Contributions accepted and separately accounted for in an election in which the candidate does not appear on the ballot, if unexpended, shall be returned to the contributors thereof pro rata without interest. Any portion thereof which cannot be returned to the original contributor thereof shall be expended only as provided in Code Section 21-5-33.

For purposes of separate accounting, a candidate shall be deemed to have advanced to the next election in the election cycle upon the official certification of the election result by the Secretary of State, or upon the concession of the candidate’s election opponents, or upon receiving a preliminary consolidated election return of 50 percent plus one for advancement to a general election, or upon receiving a preliminary consolidated election return of 50 percent or less for a runoff election and placing in one of the two spots that will advance to the runoff election, whichever event shall first occur. In the event that the official certification of the election result by the Secretary of State differs from or is in conflict with a preliminary consolidated election return for advancement to a general or runoff election, the official certification of the election result by the Secretary of State shall control for purposes of this Code section.

The commission shall adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this Code section in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 922, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 10; Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, § 11; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 4; Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 17/HB 48; Ga. L. 2022, p. 3, § 11/SB 120.

The 2022 amendment,

effective March 2, 2022, in subsection (c), substituted “the date of an election in which the candidate does appear on the ballot may” for “the date of the election may” in the first sentence, and substituted “any remaining contributions” for “such contributions” in the second sentence; in subsection (d), substituted “election in which the candidate does not appear on the ballot” for “election which does not occur or for which the candidate does not qualify” in the first sentence; added present subsection (e) and redesignated former subsection (e) as present subsection (f).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 5, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that for purposes of issuing rules and regulations, that Act became effective May 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28/HB 48, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Law reviews.

For note on the 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 247 (1992).

For article on the 2005 amendment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 119 (2005).

21-5-43.1.
[Repealed] Maximum allowable contribution by political parties.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-5-43.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 11; Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, § 11; repealed by Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 4, effective January 1, 2001.

21-5-44.
Contribution to campaign committee deemed contribution to candidate; rules for construction.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1491, § 4, effective January 1, 2001, redesignated the former provisions of this Code section as Code Section 21-5-42.

21-5-45.
[Repealed] Limitations on contributions apply separately to each election.

History.

Code 1981, Code Section 21-5-45, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 922, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1075, § 13; repealed by Ga. L. 1994, p. 258, § 11, effective March 25, 1994.